Nevada, session 83, AB496.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. Starting on the day after the period of early
voting by personal appearance begins and ending on the day after
the election results are canvassed, not later than 11 a.m. on each
day:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each county
clerk shall post on the Internet website of the county clerk the
following information for the previous day:
(1) The total number of mail ballots for the county that
have been returned to a ballot drop box;
(2) The total number of mail ballots for the county that
have been returned by the United States Postal Service or other
delivery service;
(3) The total number of mail ballots for the county that
require registered voters to cure signature defects;
(4) For each mail ballot that requires the curing of a
signature defect:
(I) The name of the registered voter; and
(II) The specific category of defect with the signature;
(5) The total number of mail ballots for the county for
which registered voters have cured signature defects;
(6) The total number of provisional ballots for the county
cast pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive; and
(7) The total number of provisional ballots for the county
cast pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; and
(b) The Secretary of State shall post on the Internet website of
the Secretary of State, a compilation of the information required
pursuant to paragraph (a) for all the counties.
2. Starting on the day after election day and ending on the
day after the election results are canvassed, not later than 11 a.m.
on each day:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each county
clerk shall post on the Internet website of the county clerk the
following information for the previous day:
(1) The total number of mail ballots for the county that are
in the custody of the county clerk;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(2) The total number of mail ballots for the county that
have been counted by the county clerk but have not been
tabulated;
(3) The total number of mail ballots for the county that
have been counted and tabulated by the county clerk;
(4) The total number of mail ballots for the county that
were treated as provisional ballots pursuant to NRS 293.269915
and for which the voter has subsequently provided the required
identification to the county clerk; and
(5) The total number of provisional ballots for the county
that were cast pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 293.3081 and for
which the voter has subsequently provided the required
identification to the county clerk; and
(b) The Secretary of State shall post on the Internet website of
the Secretary of State:
(1) A compilation of the information required pursuant to
paragraph (a) for all the counties; and
(2) An estimate of the total number of mail ballots for each
county that are in the custody of the United States Postal Service.
3. If extenuating circumstances prevent a county clerk from
reporting any information required pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 or paragraph (a) of subsection 2, the county clerk
shall post on the Internet website of the county clerk:
(a) An estimate of the time at which the county clerk will be
able to post such information; and
(b) The dates for which such information is relevant.
4. The Secretary of State shall adopt by regulation the:
(a) Specific categories of defects in signatures that require
curing by registered voters pursuant to NRS 293.269927; and
(b) Process for reporting the information relating to
provisional ballots that is required to be reported pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 3. 1. On the first business day of each month, each
county clerk shall publish on the Internet website of the county
clerk an alphabetical listing of all registered voters in the county.
2. The county clerk shall ensure that the alphabetical listing
on the Internet website may be downloaded by any person free of
charge.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.269913 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269913 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
NRS 293.269911 and chapter 293D of NRS, the county clerk shall
send to each active registered voter by first-class mail, or by any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
class of mail if the Official Election Mail logo or an equivalent logo
or mark created by the United States Postal Service is properly
placed:
(a) A mail ballot;
(b) A return envelope [;] , which must include, without
limitation, a space for the voter to write his or her telephone
number for purposes of contacting the voter, if necessary, for
signature curing or verification;
(c) An envelope or sleeve into which the mail ballot is inserted
to ensure its secrecy; and
(d) Instructions.
2. In sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the
county clerk shall use an envelope that may not be forwarded to an
address of the voter that is different from the address to which the
mail ballot is mailed.
3. The return envelope must include postage prepaid by first-
class mail if the active registered voter is within the boundaries of
the United States, its territories or possessions or on a military base.
4. Before sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the
county clerk shall record:
(a) The date the mail ballot is issued;
(b) The name of the voter to whom the mail ballot is issued, his
or her precinct or district and his or her political affiliation, if any,
unless all the offices on the mail ballot are nonpartisan offices;
(c) The number of the mail ballot; and
(d) Any remarks the county clerk finds appropriate.
5. The Secretary of State shall prescribe:
(a) The form of all envelopes in which mail ballots are sent to
voters and return envelopes, which must, except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b), be uniform throughout the State; and
(b) A method for distinguishing the return envelopes of each
county which must be prominently displayed on the outside of the
return envelope.
Sec. 5. NRS 293.3086 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3086 1. The Secretary of State shall establish a free
access system such as a toll-free telephone number or an Internet
website to inform a person who cast a provisional ballot whether the
person’s vote was counted and, if the vote was not counted, the
reason why the vote was not counted.
2. The free access system must ensure secrecy of the ballot
while protecting the confidentiality and integrity of personal
information contained therein.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
3. Access to information concerning [a] an individual
provisional ballot must be restricted to the person who cast the
provisional ballot.
Sec. 6. NRS 293.558 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.558 1. The county or city clerk shall disclose the
identification number of a registered voter to the public, including,
without limitation:
(a) In response to an inquiry received by the county or city
clerk; or
(b) By inclusion of the identification number of the registered
voter on any list of registered voters made available for public
inspection pursuant to NRS 293.301, 293.440, 293.557, 293C.290
or 293C.542 [.] or section 3 of this act.
2. The county or city clerk shall not disclose:
(a) The social security number or the driver’s license or
identification card number of a registered voter, and such a number
is confidential and is not a public book or record within the meaning
of NRS 239.010.
(b) An electronic mail address provided by a registered voter to
carry out any state or federal law relating to the voting process, and
such an electronic mail address is confidential and is not a public
book or record within the meaning of NRS 239.010. The county or
city clerk may not release a registered voter’s electronic mail
address to a third party and may use such an electronic mail address
only to:
(1) Communicate with the registered voter about the voting
process, including, without limitation, as necessary to carry out the
provisions of chapter 293D of NRS; and
(2) Distribute a sample ballot to the registered voter by
electronic means if the county or city clerk has established a system
for distributing sample ballots by electronic means pursuant to NRS
293.565 or 293C.530 and the registered voter elects to receive a
sample ballot by electronic means.
3. A registered voter may submit a written request to the
county or city clerk to have his or her address and telephone number
withheld from the public. Upon receipt of such a request, the county
or city clerk shall not disclose the address or telephone number of
the registered voter to the public, including, without limitation:
(a) In response to an inquiry received by the county or city
clerk; or
(b) By inclusion on any list of registered voters made available
for public inspection pursuant to NRS 293.301, 293.440, 293.557,
293C.290 or 293C.542 [.] or section 3 of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
4. No information relating to a registered voter may be
withheld from the public other than:
(a) The address and telephone number of the registered voter if
requested by the registered voter pursuant to this section;
(b) An electronic mail address provided by the registered voter
to carry out any state or federal law relating to the voting process;
(c) The social security number and driver’s license or
identification card number of the registered voter; and
(d) Any other information relating to the registered voter that
any state or federal law declares to be confidential or otherwise
requires to be withheld from the public.
Sec. 7. NRS 293.5882 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5882 1. The Secretary of State shall establish a free
access system, such as a toll-free telephone number or an Internet
website, to inform a person who cast a provisional ballot whether
the person’s ballot was counted and, if the ballot was not counted,
the reason why the ballot was not counted.
2. The free access system must ensure secrecy of the ballot
while protecting the confidentiality and integrity of personal
information contained therein.
3. Access to information concerning [a] an individual
provisional ballot must be restricted to the person who cast the
provisional ballot.
Sec. 8. Chapter 293C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Starting on the day after the period of early voting by
personal appearance begins and ending on the day after the
election results are canvassed, not later than 11 a.m. on each day:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each city
clerk shall post on the Internet website of the city clerk the
following information for the previous day:
(1) The total number of mail ballots for the city that have
been returned to a ballot drop box;
(2) The total number of mail ballots for the city that have
been returned by the United States Postal Service or other delivery
service;
(3) The total number of mail ballots for the city that require
registered voters to cure signature defects;
(4) For each mail ballot that requires the curing of a
signature defect:
(I) The name of the registered voter; and
(II) The specific category of defect with the signature;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(5) The total number of mail ballots for the city for which
registered voters have cured signature defects;
(6) The total number of provisional ballots for the city cast
pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive; and
(7) The total number of provisional ballots for the city cast
pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; and
(b) The Secretary of State shall post on the Internet website of
the Secretary of State, a compilation of the information required
pursuant to paragraph (a) for all the cities.
2. Starting on the day after election day and ending on the
day after the election results are canvassed, not later than 11 a.m.
on each day:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each city
clerk shall post on the Internet website of the city clerk the
following information for the previous day:
(1) The total number of mail ballots for the city that are in
the custody of the city clerk;
(2) The total number of mail ballots for the city that have
been counted by the city clerk but have not been tabulated;
(3) The total number of mail ballots for the city that have
been counted and tabulated by the city clerk;
(4) The total number of mail ballots for the city that were
treated as provisional ballots pursuant to NRS 293C.26314 and for
which the voter has subsequently provided the required
identification to the city clerk; and
(5) The total number of provisional ballots for the city that
were cast pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 293.3081 and for which
the voter has subsequently provided the required identification to
the city clerk; and
(b) The Secretary of State shall post on the Internet website of
the Secretary of State:
(1) A compilation of the information required pursuant to
paragraph (a) for all the cities; and
(2) An estimate of the total number of mail ballots for each
city that are in the custody of the United States Postal Service.
3. If extenuating circumstances prevent a city clerk from
reporting any information required pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 or paragraph (a) of subsection 2, the city clerk shall
post on the Internet website of the city clerk:
(a) An estimate of the time at which the city clerk will be able
to post such information; and
(b) The dates for which such information is relevant.
4. The Secretary of State shall adopt by regulation the:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(a) Specific categories of defects in signatures that require
curing by registered voters pursuant to NRS 293C.26327; and
(b) Process for reporting the information relating to
provisional ballots that is required to be reported pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 9. NRS 293C.26312 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26312 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
NRS 293C.263 and chapter 293D of NRS, the city clerk shall send
to each active registered voter by first-class mail, or by any class of
mail if the Official Election Mail logo or an equivalent logo or mark
created by the United States Postal Service is properly placed:
(a) A mail ballot;
(b) A return envelope [;] , which must include, without
limitation, a space for the voter to write his or her telephone
number for purposes of contacting the voter, if necessary, for
signature curing or verification;
(c) An envelope or sleeve into which the mail ballot is inserted
to ensure its secrecy; and
(d) Instructions.
2. In sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the city
clerk shall use an envelope that may not be forwarded to an address
of the voter that is different from the address to which the mail
ballot is mailed.
3. The return envelope must include postage prepaid by first-
class mail if the active registered voter is within the boundaries of
the United States, its territories or possessions or on a military base.
4. Before sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the
city clerk shall record:
(a) The date the mail ballot is issued;
(b) The name of the voter to whom the mail ballot is issued, his
or her precinct or district and his or her political affiliation, if any,
unless all the offices on the mail ballot are nonpartisan offices;
(c) The number of the mail ballot; and
(d) Any remarks the city clerk finds appropriate.
5. The Secretary of State shall prescribe:
(a) The form of all envelopes in which mail ballots are sent to
voters and return envelopes, which must, except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b), be uniform throughout the State; and
(b) A method for distinguishing the return envelopes of each
city which must be prominently displayed on the outside of the
return envelope.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
Sec. 10. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 11. 1. This section and section 10 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)